New York, session 2025-2026, A11729.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraphs 24, 25 and 26 of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 9 of section 208 of the tax law are REPEALED. 3 § 2. Subparagraphs 28 and 29 of paragraph (b) of subdivision 9 of 4 section 208 of the tax law are REPEALED. 5 § 3. Paragraphs 44 and 45 of subsection (b) of section 612 of the tax 6 law are REPEALED. 7 § 4. Paragraphs 48, 49 and 50 of subsection (c) of section 612 of the 8 tax law, paragraph 48 as added by section 4 of part F of chapter 59 of 9 the laws of 2026, are REPEALED. 10 § 5. Subparagraphs (X), (Y) and (Z) of paragraph 1 of subdivision (b) 11 of section 1503 of the tax law are REPEALED. 12 § 6. Subparagraphs (AA) and (BB) of paragraph 2 of subdivision (b) of 13 section 1503 of the tax law are REPEALED. 14 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16149-01-6